pt-PT: Tipo de som: Sons de animais; Sons de bateria/percussão; Variedade de instrumentos; Notas de piano/teclado; Músicas/melodias; Efeitos sonoros; Sons de veículos; Comandos de voz; Outro
es: Tipo de sonido: Sonidos de animales; Sonidos de batería o percusión; Surtido de instrumentos; Notas de piano o teclado; Canciones o melodías; Efectos de sonido; Sonidos de vehículos; Indicaciones de voz; Otro
fi: Äänityyppi: Eläinten äänet; Rumpujen/lyömäsoitinten äänet; Soitinvalikoima; Pianon/koskettimiston nuotit; Kappaleet/melodiat; Äänitehosteet; Ajoneuvojen äänet; Äänikehotteet; Muu
nb: Lydtype: Dyrelyder; Tromme-/perkusjonslyder; Instrumentutvalg; Piano-/keyboardtoner; Sanger/melodier; Lydeffekter; Kjøretøylyder; Talekommandoer; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de sunet: Sunete de animale; Sunete de tobe/percuție; Asortiment de instrumente; Note de pian/claviatură; Cântece/melodii; Efecte sonore; Sunete de vehicule; Indicații vocale; Altele
nl: Geluidstype: Dierengeluiden; Drum-/percussiegeluiden; Instrumentenassortiment; Piano-/keyboardnoten; Liedjes/melodieën; Geluidseffecten; Voertuiggeluiden; Spraakprompts; Anders
bg-BG: Тип звук: Животински звуци; Звуци от барабани/перкусии; Различни инструменти; Ноти на пиано/синтезатор; Песни/мелодии; Звукови ефекти; Звуци на превозни средства; Гласови подкани; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta zvuka: Zvukovi životinja; Zvukovi bubnjeva/udaraljki; Razni instrumenti; Note klavira/klavijature; Pjesme/melodije; Zvučni efekti; Zvukovi vozila; Glasovne upute; Ostalo
de: Klangart: Tiergeräusche; Drum-/Percussion-Sounds; Instrumenten-Mix; Klavier-/Keyboardtöne; Lieder/Melodien; Soundeffekte; Fahrzeuggeräusche; Sprachansagen; Andere
ru: Тип звука: Звуки животных; Звуки барабанов/перкуссии; Набор инструментов; Ноты пианино/клавишных; Песни/мелодии; Звуковые эффекты; Звуки транспорта; Голосовые подсказки; Другое
zh-CN: 声音类型: 动物叫声; 鼓/打击乐器声音; 各种乐器声音; 钢琴/键盘音符; 歌曲/旋律; 音效; 车辆声音; 语音提示; 其他
vi: Loại âm thanh: Âm thanh động vật; Âm thanh trống/nhạc cụ gõ; Tuyển tập nhạc cụ; Nốt đàn piano/keyboard; Bài hát/giai điệu; Hiệu ứng âm thanh; Âm thanh xe cộ; Chỉ dẫn bằng giọng nói; Khác
it: Tipo di suono: Suoni di animali; Suoni di batteria/percussioni; Assortimento di strumenti; Note di pianoforte/tastiera; Canzoni/melodie; Effetti sonori; Suoni di veicoli; Prompt vocali; Altro
ko: 소리 유형: 동물 소리; 드럼/타악기 소리; 악기 모음; 피아노/키보드 음; 노래/멜로디; 효과음; 차량 소리; 음성 프롬프트; 기타
en: Sound type: Animal sounds; Drum/percussion sounds; Instrument assortment; Piano/keyboard notes; Songs/melodies; Sound effects; Vehicle sounds; Voice prompts; Other
th: ประเภทเสียง: เสียงสัตว์; เสียงกลอง/เครื่องกระทบ; เครื่องดนตรีหลากหลาย; โน้ตเปียโน/คีย์บอร์ด; เพลง/ทำนอง; เอฟเฟกต์เสียง; เสียงยานพาหนะ; เสียงเตือน; อื่นๆ
ja: サウンドタイプ: 動物の鳴き声; ドラム / パーカッション音; 楽器の詰め合わせ; ピアノ / キーボード音; 歌 / メロディー; サウンドエフェクト; 乗り物の音; 音声プロンプト; その他
el: Τύπος ήχου: Ήχοι ζώων; Ήχοι τυμπάνων/κρουστών; Ποικιλία οργάνων; Νότες πιάνου/αρμόνιου; Τραγούδια/μελωδίες; Ηχητικά εφέ; Ήχοι οχημάτων; Φωνητικές προτροπές; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta zvoka: Živalski zvoki; Zvoki bobnov/tolkal; Nabor inštrumentov; Note klavirja/klaviature; Pesmi/melodije; Zvočni učinki; Zvoki vozil; Glasovni pozivi; Drugo
da: Lydtype: Dyrelyde; Tromme-/percussionlyde; Instrumentsortiment; Klaver-/keyboard-toner; Sange/melodier; Lydeffekter; Køretøjslyde; Stemmemeddelelser; Andet
sk-SK: Typ zvuku: Zvieracie zvuky; Zvuky bicích/perkusií; Rôzne nástroje; Tóny klavíra/klávesov; Piesne/melódie; Zvukové efekty; Zvuky vozidiel; Hlasové výzvy; Iný
pt-BR: Som tipo: Sons de animais; Sons de bateria/percussão; Variedade de instrumentos; Notas de piano/teclado; Músicas/melodias; Efeitos sonoros; Sons de veículos; Avisos de voz; Outro
pl: Rodzaj dźwięku: Odgłosy zwierząt; Dźwięki perkusji / instrumentów perkusyjnych; Zestaw instrumentów; Dźwięki pianina / keyboardu; Piosenki / melodie; Efekty dźwiękowe; Odgłosy pojazdów; Komunikaty głosowe; Inne
cs: Typ zvuku: Zvuky zvířat; Zvuky bicích/perkusí; Různé nástroje; Tóny klavíru/kláves; Písně/melodie; Zvukové efekty; Zvuky vozidel; Hlasové pokyny; Jiné
lt-LT: Garso tipas: Gyvūnų garsai; Būgnų / perkusijos garsai; Instrumentų asortimentas; Fortepijono / klavišinių natos; Dainos / melodijos; Garso efektai; Transporto priemonių garsai; Garsiniai raginimai; Kita
hu: Hangtípus: Állathangok; Dob/ütőshangok; Különféle hangszerek; Zongora/szintetizátor hangok; Dalok/dallamok; Hangeffektek; Járműhangok; Hangutasítások; Egyéb
fr: Type de son: Bruits d’animaux; Sons de batterie/percussion; Assortiment d’instruments; Notes de piano/clavier; Chansons/mélodies; Effets sonores; Bruits de véhicules; Invites vocales; Autre
tr: Ses türü: Hayvan sesleri; Bateri/perküsyon sesleri; Enstrüman çeşitleri; Piyano/klavye notaları; Şarkılar/melodiler; Ses efektleri; Araç sesleri; Sesli istemler; Diğer
sv: Ljudtyp: Djurläten; Trum-/slagverksljud; Instrumentsortiment; Piano-/keyboardtoner; Låtar/melodier; Ljudeffekter; Fordonsljud; Röstmeddelanden; Övrigt
zh-TW: 聲音類型: 動物聲音; 鼓/打擊樂器聲音; 樂器組合; 鋼琴/鍵盤音符; 歌曲/旋律; 音效; 車輛聲音; 語音提示; 其他